Oklahoma, session 2026, SB281.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Make Adoption


Affordable Again Act”.



Req. No. 1547 Page 1


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


A. The Legislature hereby finds that:


1. Stable and loving families are foundational to the well-


being of children and the moral fabric of this state;


2. Adoption provides a critical pathway for children without


families to achieve stability and to flourish;


3. The financial burden of adoption remains a significant


obstacle for Oklahoma families;


4. Churches and private organizations are uniquely positioned


to play a vital role in facilitating and funding adoptions,


consistent with historical and community practices; and


5. This state has a compelling interest in minimizing


government intervention in private and religious adoption


initiatives while promoting community-driven solutions.


B. Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature to:


1. Increase adoptions in Oklahoma by reducing financial


barriers for adoptive families;


2. Promote and prioritize private and faith-based organizations


as partners in facilitating adoption funding;


3. Ensure financial support for adoption while respecting


principles of religious freedom and minimizing state involvement;


and



Req. No. 1547 Page 2


4. Provide clear, enforceable legal standards to protect the


program from constitutional challenges and administrative overreach.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2357.415 of Title 68, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “Adoption funding organization” means a church or an


organization exempt from federal income tax pursuant to Section


501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and


certified by the Oklahoma Tax Commission to manage and distribute


adoption funds pursuant to subsection F of this section;


2. “Qualified adoption expenses” means adoption fees, legal


fees, counseling costs required to adopt, costs for pre-adoption


home studies, travel costs required to adopt, and required post-


placement service fees; and


3. “In-kind contribution” means the value of nonmonetary


donations of goods and services directly to the supporting adoption


services of an adoption funding organization, as determined by the


Oklahoma Tax Commission.


B. For tax year 2026 and subsequent tax years, there shall be


allowed a credit against the tax imposed pursuant to Section 2355 of


Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes equal to the amount donated to an


adoption funding organization to support adoption services and the


amount of in-kind contributions.

Req. No. 1547 Page 3


C. Credit claimed pursuant to subsection B of this section


shall not exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) for individual


taxpayers and Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) for any taxpayer


that is a business entity formed under the laws of any state,


including limited and general partnerships, corporations, and


limited liability companies.


D. If the credit allowed pursuant to subsection B this section


exceeds the tax imposed by Section 2355 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma


Statutes, the excess amount shall be refunded to the taxpayer.


E. For tax year 2028 and subsequent tax years, the total amount


of credits authorized pursuant to subsection B of this section shall


be adjusted annually to limit the annual amount of credits to Ten


Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00). The Oklahoma Tax Commission shall


annually calculate and publish a percentage by which the credits


authorized by this section shall be reduced so the total amount of


credits used to offset tax does not exceed the annual limit. The


formula to be used for the percentage adjustment shall be Ten


Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00) divided by the amount of credit


claimed in the second preceding tax year. In the event the total


tax credits authorized by this section exceed the annual limit in


any tax year, the Tax Commission shall permit any excess but shall


factor such excess into the percentage adjustment formula for


subsequent tax years.



Req. No. 1547 Page 4


F. The Oklahoma Tax Commission shall prescribe an application


for organizations to be certified as an adoption funding


organization based on the following criteria:


1. Status as an organization exempt from federal income tax


pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986,


as amended;


2. Sufficient evidence, as determined by the Commission, that


the organization provides essential services that lead to decreed


adoptions; and


3. Written commitment from the organization to adhere to all


compliance and reporting requirements prescribed by this section and


the Commission.


G. To maintain compliance as a certified adoption funding


organization in a subsequent tax year, the organization shall:


1. Have expended at least fifty percent (50%) of funds donated


in the preceding tax year for adoption services to those services;


2. Except as provided for in paragraph 3 of this subsection,


have expended all funds donated for adoption services in the second


preceding tax year for adoption services to those services;


3. If the requirements of paragraph 2 of this subsection are


not met, have allocated all remaining funds donated for adoption


services from the second preceding tax year to another adoption


funding organization or shall have been expended on adoption



Req. No. 1547 Page 5


education campaigns in this state by the end of the preceding tax


year;


4. Have expended no more than twenty percent (20%) of funds


donated for adoption services on compensation for employees of the


organization; and


5. Electronically submit an annual report for each preceding


tax year, which shall contain:


a. funds donated for adoption services,


b. amount expended on adoption services,


c. compensation expenditures for employees who engage in


adoption services,


d. any fund transfers to other adoption funding


organizations, and


e. expenditures on adoption education campaigns.


H. The Commission shall electronically send a notice of


noncompliance to any adoption funding organization that is


noncompliant with the provisions of this section or the rules


prescribed by the Commission pursuant to this section. If the


adoption funding organization fails to come into compliance within


ninety (90) days of the delivery of the notice of noncompliance, the


Commission may revoke certification.


SECTION 4. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 341, O.S.L.


2022 (68 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 2357.601), is amended to read as


follows:

Req. No. 1547 Page 6


Section 2357.601. A. As used in this section, “nonrecurring


adoption expenses” means adoption fees, court costs, medical


expenses, attorney fees, and expenses which are directly related to


the legal process of adoption of a child including, but not limited


to, costs relating to the adoption study, health and psychological


examinations, transportation, and reasonable costs of lodging and


food for the child or adoptive parents which are incurred to


complete the adoption process and are not reimbursed by other


sources. The term nonrecurring adoption expenses shall not include


attorney fees incurred for the purpose of litigating a contested


adoption, from and after the point of the initiation of the contest,


costs associated with physical remodeling, renovation, and


alteration of the adoptive parents’ home or property, except for a


special needs child as authorized by the court.


B. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2023,


there shall be allowed a credit against the tax imposed pursuant to


Section 2355 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title for


nonrecurring adoption expenses paid by a resident individual


taxpayer in connection with:


1. The adoption of a minor; or


2. A proposed adoption of a minor which did not result in a


decreed adoption.


C. The For tax years 2023 through 2025, the amount of the tax


credit authorized by this section shall be equal to ten percent

Req. No. 1547 Page 7


(10%) of the qualified expenses but the credit amount shall not


exceed Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) per calendar tax year with


respect to single filing status or married filing separate income


tax returns and shall not exceed Four Thousand Dollars ($4,000.00)


per calendar tax year with respect to married filing joint return


filing status. For tax years 2023 through 2025, the amount of the


tax credit authorized by this section shall be equal to one hundred


percent (100%) of the qualified expenses but the credit amount shall


not exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) per tax year.


D. The Oklahoma Tax Commission shall promulgate rules to


implement the provisions of this section which shall contain a


specific list of nonrecurring adoption expenses which may be


presumed to qualify for the tax credit. The Tax Commission shall


prescribe necessary requirements for verification.


SECTION 5. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 6. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1547 QD 12/30/2024 10:55:58 PM







Req. No. 1547 Page 8